Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.835

Agritourism—Warning notice.

(1) Every agritourism professional must post and maintain signs that contain the warning notice specified in subsection (2) of this section. The sign must be placed in a clearly visible location at the entrance to the agritourism location and at the site of the agritourism activity. The warning notice must consist of a sign in black letters, with each letter to be a minimum of one inch in height. Every written contract entered into by an agritourism professional for the providing of professional services, instruction, or the rental of equipment to a participant, whether or not the contract involves agritourism activities on or off the location or at the site of the agritourism activity, must contain in clearly readable print the warning notice specified in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The sign and contracts described in subsection (1) of this section must contain the following notice of warning:

"WARNING

Under Washington state law, there is limited liability for an injury to or death of a participant in an agritourism activity conducted at this agritourism location if such an injury or death results exclusively from the inherent risks of the agritourism activity. Inherent risks of agritourism activities include, among others, risks of injury inherent to land, equipment, and animals, as well as the potential for you to act in a negligent manner that may contribute to your injury or death. We are required to ensure that in any activity involving minor children, only age-appropriate access to activities, equipment, and animals is permitted. You are assuming the risk of participating in this agritourism activity."

(3) Failure to comply with the requirements concerning warning signs and notices provided in this section prohibits an agritourism professional from invoking the privilege of immunity provided by this section, section 1, chapter 227, Laws of 2017, and RCW 4.24.830 and 4.24.832 and may be introduced as evidence in any claim for damages.

[ 2017 c 227 s 4.]

NOTES:

Finding—2017 c 227: See note following RCW 4.24.832.